District of Columbia statutes.
4-213.06

Verification of ability to contribute.

The ability of responsible relatives to contribute shall be determined through verification of earnings and other income at time of application, and whenever circumstances indicate the need to do so, but in no case less frequently than once every 12 months.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1306, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-213.6.